District of Columbia statutes.
31-4309

Repealed

Representation of financial standing—All companies or agents.

Repealed.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1132, ch. 672, ch. II, § 10
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-265, § 126(a), 48 DCR 1225
redesignated § 301, Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 20(b), 49 DCR 8140
1981 Ed., § 35-409.
1973 Ed., § 35-409.